Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-18] Electronic Signatures in Global
and National Commerce Act. The provisions of this chapter governing the
legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or signatures,
and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures
conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in
Global and National Commerce Act, Pub. L. No. 106-229, 114 Stat. 464 (2000),
and supersede, modify, and limit the Electronic Signatures in Global and
National Commerce Act. [L 2007, c 248, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next